Maine, session 132, LD489.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6506, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 627, §5, is amended to
read:
2. Licensed activity; commercial license. The holder of a commercial halibut fishing
license issued under subsection 1 may fish for, take, possess, ship, transport or sell halibut
that the holder has taken using the vessel named on the license. Crew members aboard a
license holder’s vessel may fish for, take, possess, ship or transport halibut only if the
license provides for crew members.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §6506, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Exception to using vessel named on license holder's license for commercial
license holders. Notwithstanding subsection 2, the commissioner may temporarily
authorize a holder of a commercial halibut fishing license to use a vessel other than the
vessel named on that license holder's license to fish for, take, possess, ship or transport
halibut if the license holder documents to the commissioner that the vessel named on that
license holder's license has become temporarily inoperable because of an accident or a
mechanical failure and requests in writing to the commissioner that the commissioner
authorize the use of another vessel to fish for or take halibut. The commissioner's
authorization may require the license holder to fish for, take, possess and land halibut
separately from any halibut taken under another license listing the same vessel to ensure
Page 1 - 132LR1062(03)

that harvest limits are not exceeded. An authorization granted by the commissioner to a
license holder due to an accident or a mechanical failure may not exceed 2 weeks. The
commissioner may authorize one 2-week extension per license holder during the
commercial halibut fishing season. An authorization under this subsection may not be
granted by the commissioner in 2 consecutive years.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR1062(03)